zh-CN: 漫画创作者角色: 艺术家（常规）; 上色师; 封面画师; 创作者（常规）; 编辑; 墨线师; 嵌字师; 铅笔画师; 作者; 其他
ja: コミッククリエイター役割: アーティスト (一般); カラーリスト; カバーアーティスト; クリエイター (一般); 編集者; インカー; レタラー; ペンシラー; ライター; その他
bg-BG: Роля на създателя на комикса: Художник (общо); Колорист; Художник на корицата; Създател (общо); Редактор; Тушист; Шрифтовик; Рисувач (молив); Писател; Друго
en: Comic creator role: Artist (general); Colorist; Cover artist; Creator (general); Editor; Inker; Letterer; Penciler; Writer; Other
pl: Rola twórcy komiksu: Artysta (ogólny); Kolorysta; Autor okładki; Twórca (ogólnie); Redaktor; Inker; Liternik; Szkicownik; Scenarzysta; Inna
pt-BR: Função do criador de quadrinhos: Artista (geral); Colorista; Capista; Criador (geral); Editor; Arte-finalista; Letrista; Desenhista; Roteirista; Outro
hu: Képregénykészítői szerepkör: Rajzoló (általános); Színező; Borítórajzoló; Alkotó (általános); Szerkesztő; Kihúzó; Beíró; Ceruzarajzoló; Író; Egyéb
pt-PT: Função de criador de banda desenhada: Artista (geral); Colorista; Artista de capa; Criador (geral); Editor; Arte-finalista; Letrista; Desenhador; Argumentista; Outro
de: Rolle des Comicschöpfers: Künstler:in (allgemein); Colorist:in; Cover-Künstler:in; Creator:in (allgemein); Redakteur:in; Inker:in; Letterer:in; Vorzeichner:in; Autor:in; Sonstige
th: บทบาทของผู้สร้างการ์ตูน: ศิลปิน (ทั่วไป); นักลงสี; นักวาดหน้าปก; ครีเอเตอร์ (ทั่วไป); บรรณาธิการ; นักตัดเส้น; นักเขียนตัวอักษร; นักร่างภาพ; นักเขียน; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Rolul de creator de benzi desenate: Artist (general); Colorist; Artist copertă; Creator (general); Editor; Conturator; Grafician litere; Desenator; Scriitor; Altele
da: Rollen som tegneserieskaber: Tegner (generelt); Farvelægger; Forsidetegner; Skaber (generelt); Redaktør; Rentegner; Tekster; Blyantstegner; Forfatter; Andet
ru: Роль создателя комикса: Художник (общий профиль); Колорист; Художник обложки; Создатель (общий профиль); Редактор; Контуровщик; Шрифтовик; Художник-карандашист; Сценарист; Другое
ko: 만화 작가 역할: 아티스트(일반); 컬러리스트; 커버 아티스트; 크리에이터(일반); 편집자; 잉커; 레터러; 펜슬러; 작가; 기타
vi: Vai trò người sáng tạo truyện tranh: Họa sĩ (chung); Họa sĩ tô màu; Họa sĩ vẽ bìa; Người sáng tạo (chung); Biên tập viên; Họa sĩ đi nét; Người điền chữ; Họa sĩ phác thảo; Tác giả kịch bản; Khác
el: Ρόλος δημιουργού κόμικ: Καλλιτέχνης (γενικά); Colorist; Καλλιτέχνης εξωφύλλου; Δημιουργός (γενικά); Επιμελητής; Μελανωτής; Letterer; Σχεδιαστής (μολύβι); Συγγραφέας; Άλλο
fi: Sarjakuvan luojan rooli: Taiteilija (yleinen); Värittäjä; Kansitaiteilija; Tekijä (yleinen); Toimittaja; Tussaaja; Tekstaaja; Piirtäjä; Käsikirjoittaja; Muu
it: Comic Creator ruolo: Disegnatore (generico); Colorista; Copertinista; Creatore (generico); Editor; Inchiostratore; Letterista; Matitista; Sceneggiatore; Altro
sl-SI: Vloga ustvarjalca stripov: Ilustrator (splošno); Kolorist; Ilustrator naslovnice; Ustvarjalec (splošno); Urednik; Tušer; Črkovalec; Risar; Pisec; Drugo
zh-TW: 漫畫創作者角色: 繪者 (一般); 上色師; 封面繪者; 創作者 (一般); 編輯; 墨線師; 嵌字師; 鉛筆稿師; 作者; 其他
es: Rol del creador del cómic: Artista (general); Colorista; Artista de portada; Creador (general); Editor; Entintador; Letrista; Dibujante a lápiz; Escritor; Otro
sk-SK: Úloha tvorcu komiksu: Ilustrátor (všeobecne); Kolorista; Autor obálky; Tvorca (všeobecne); Redaktor; Inker; Letterer; Kresliar; Scenárista; Iné
hr-HR: Uloga kreatora stripa: Ilustrator (općenito); Kolorist; Ilustrator naslovnice; Kreator (općenito); Urednik; Tušer; Upisivač teksta; Crtač; Scenarist; Ostalo
nl: Stripmaker rol: Tekenaar (algemeen); Inkleurder; Omslagtekenaar; Maker (algemeen); Redacteur; Inkter; Letteraar; Potloodtekenaar; Schrijver; Overige
cs: Role tvůrce komiksu: Výtvarník (obecně); Kolorista; Autor obálky; Tvůrce (obecně); Editor; Tušar; Letterer; Kreslíř; Scenárista; Ostatní
lt-LT: Komikso kūrėjo vaidmuo: Dailininkas (bendras); Koloristas; Viršelio autorius; Kūrėjas (bendras); Redaktorius; Kontūruotojas; Šrifto dizaineris; Pieštukinio eskizo autorius; Rašytojas; Kita
nb: Tegneserieskaperens rolle: Tegner (generelt); Fargelegger; Omslagstegner; Skaper (generelt); Redaktør; Tusjer; Tekster; Skissemaker; Forfatter; Annet
fr: Rôle du créateur de bande dessinée: Artiste (général); Coloriste; Artiste de couverture; Créateur (général); Éditeur; Encreur; Lettreur; Dessinateur; Scénariste; Autre
sv: Skaparen: Tecknare (allmänt); Färgläggare; Omslagstecknare; Skapare (allmänt); Redaktör; Tuschare; Textare; Skisstecknare; Författare; Övrigt
tr: Çizgi roman yaratıcısı rolü: Çizer (genel); Renklendirici; Kapak çizeri; Yaratıcı (genel); Editör; Çinileyici; Harflemeci; Kurşun kalem çizeri; Yazar; Diğer